Illinois, session 104th, HB2641.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-171 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-171 new)7    Sec. 15-171. Senior citizens school district homestead 8exemption.9    (a) For taxable year 2026 and each taxable year 10thereafter, in addition to any other homestead exemption to 11which the property is entitled under this Code, qualified 12homestead property is exempt from any property tax levied by a 13school district. 14    (b) If a homestead exemption has been granted under this 15Section and the qualified applicant subsequently becomes a 16resident of a facility licensed under the Assisted Living and 17Shared Housing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 18Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community 19Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall continue so 20long as (i) the residence continues to be occupied by the 21qualified applicant's spouse and the spouse is 67 years of age 22or older or (ii) the residence is unoccupied but is still owned 23by the qualified applicant.   HB2641- 2 -LRB104 09756 HLH 19822 b1    (c) Applications for the homestead exemption under this 2Section must be made during the application period in effect 3for the county in which the property is located. The assessor 4or chief county assessment officer may determine the 5eligibility of property to receive the homestead exemption 6provided by this Section by application, visual inspection, 7questionnaire, or other reasonable methods. 8    (d) Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 9Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 10implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 11    (e) As used in this Section: 12    "Applicant" means an individual who applies for a 13homestead exemption under this Section. 14    "Homestead property" has the meaning given to that term in 15Section 15-175. 16    "Qualified applicant" means an applicant who (i) will be 1767 years of age or older during the taxable year for which the 18exemption under this Section is being sought, (ii) is liable 19for the payment of property taxes on the qualified homestead 20property, and (iii) is an owner of record of the qualified 21homestead property or has a legal, equitable, or leasehold 22interest in the property, as evidenced by a written 23instrument. 24    "Qualified homestead property" means homestead property, 25but less any portion of that property that is used for 26commercial purposes, with an equalized assessed value of less   HB2641- 3 -LRB104 09756 HLH 19822 b1than $250,000 that, as of January 1 of the taxable year, is the 2primary residence of a qualified applicant. Property that is 3rented for more than 6 months is presumed to be used for 4commercial purposes. 5    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 6valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are 7levied.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.